Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.360

Liability insurance for officials and employees authorized.

The board of directors of each school district may purchase liability insurance with such limits as they may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting their officials and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1973 c 125 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.423.]